ko: 음성 녹음기 폼 팩터: 팔찌; 필드 레코더 모듈; 휴대용; 열쇠고리; 라펠 팩; 펜; 파워뱅크; USB 플래시 드라이브; 웨어러블; 기타
cs: Provedení hlasového rekordéru: Náramek; Modul terénního rekordéru; Ruční; Klíčenka; Klopové pouzdro; Kapesní; Powerbanka; USB flash disk; Nositelný; Jiné
lt-LT: Balso įrašymo įrenginio formos faktorius: Apyrankė; Lauko įrašymo modulis; Rankinis; Raktų pakabukas; Atlape segamas; „Pen“ geležtė; Išorinio maitinimo akumuliatorius; USB atmintinė; Nešiojamas; Kita
pt-BR: Formato do gravador de voz: Pulseira; Módulo gravador de campo; Portátil; Chaveiro; Pacote de lapela; Cercado; Banco de potência; Flash Drive USB; Vestível; Outro
sv: Röstinspelares formfaktor: Armband; Fältinspelningsmodul; Handhållen; Nyckelring; Klämmikspaket; Hage; Powerbank; USB-minne; Bärbar; Övrigt
bg-BG: Типоразмер на диктофон: Гривна; Модул за полеви запис; Преносим; Ключодържател; Петличен пакет; Електронна цигара; Външно зарядно устройство; USB флаш устройство; Носим; Други
th: รูปแบบของเครื่องบันทึกเสียง: สร้อยข้อมือ; โมดูลเครื่องบันทึกภาคสนาม; แบบมือถือ; พวงกุญแจ; แพ็กติดปกเสื้อ; คอก; พาวเวอร์แบงค์; แฟลชไดรฟ์ USB; สวมใส่ได้; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Formát hlasového rekordéra: Náramok; Modul terénneho rekordéra; Ručný; Kľúčenka; Klopový balík; Ohrada; Power banka; USB flash disk; Nositeľný; Iné
sl-SI: Oblika snemalnika zvoka: Zapestnica; Modul terenskega snemalnika; Ročna; Obesek za ključe; Paket za rever; Pisalo; Napajalna banka; USB bliskovni pogon; Nosljivi; Drugo
da: Stemmeoptagerens formfaktor: Armbånd; Feltoptagemodul; Håndholdt; Nøglering; Lapelpakke; Indelukke; Powerbank; USB-flashdrev; Bærbar; Andet
ja: ボイスレコーダーフォームファクター: ブレスレット; フィールドレコーダーモジュール; ハンドヘルド; キーチェーン; ラペルパック; ペン; パワーバンク; USBフラッシュドライブ; ウェアラブル; その他
zh-CN: 录音笔外形: 手环; 现场录音模块; 手持式; 钥匙链; 翻领包; 小窝; 充电宝; USB 闪存驱动器/U 盘; 可穿戴; 其他
nb: Stemmeopptaker formfaktor: Armbånd; Feltopptakermodul; Håndholdt; Nøkkelring; Jakkeoppslag-pakke; Penn; Powerbank; Minnepenn; Bærbar; Annet
hr-HR: Oblik glasovnog snimača: Narukvica; Modul terenskog snimača; Ručno; Privjesak; Rever paket; Ograda; Prijenosni punjač; USB Flash memorija; Nosivi; Ostalo
en: Voice recorder form factor: Bracelet; Field recorder module; Handheld; Keychain; Lapel pack; Pen; Power bank; USB flash drive; Wearable; Other
de: Sprachrekorder-Formfaktor: Armband; Feldrekorder-Modul; Handgerät; Keychain; Ansteckgerät; Pen; Powerbank; USB-Stick; Tragbar; Sonstiges
fr: Facteur de forme de l’enregistreur vocal: Bracelet; Module d'enregistreur de terrain; Portatif; Porte-clés; Boîtier cravate; Enclos; Banque d’alimentation; Clés USB; Portable; Autre
ru: Формфактор диктофона: Браслет; Модуль полевого рекордера; Вручную; Брелок; Петличный блок; Загон; Внешний аккумулятор; Флеш-накопитель USB; Носимый; Другой
nl: Spraakrecorder vormfactor: Armband; Veldrecorder module; Handbediend; Sleutelhanger; Revers pakket; Kooi; Powerbank; USB-stick; Draagbaar; Andere
hu: Hangrögzítő formátuma: Karkötő; Terepi rögzítő modul; Kézi; Kulcstartó; Hajtókás csomag; Karám; Power bank; USB flash meghajtó; Viselhető; Egyéb
el: Μορφή συσκευής εγγραφής φωνής: Βραχιόλι; Μονάδα εγγραφής πεδίου; Χειροκίνητη; Μπρελόκ; Πακέτο πέτου; Pen; Τροφοδοτικό ισχύος (Power bank); Οδηγός USB; Φορητό; Άλλο
zh-TW: 錄音筆外型規格: 手鏈; 現場錄音模組; 手持式; 鑰匙鏈; 領夾式; 筆刀; 行動電源; 隨身碟; 穿戴式; 其他
tr: Ses kayıt cihazı form faktörü: Bileklik; Saha kayıt modülü; Elde taşınan; Anahtarlık; Yaka paketi; Kalem; Power bank; USB bellek; Giyilebilir; Diğer
vi: Kiểu dáng máy ghi âm: Vòng đeo tay; Module ghi âm hiện trường; Cầm tay; Móc chìa khóa; Gói ve áo; Bút; Sạc dự phòng; Ổ đĩa USB Flash; Đeo được; Khác
ro-RO: Factor de formă înregistrator vocal: Brățară; Modul înregistrator de teren; De mână; Breloc; Pachet de rever; Țarc; Baterie externă; USB flash drive; Purtabil; Altele
pl: Format dyktafonu: Bransoletka; Moduł rejestratora terenowego; Mobilny; Brelok do kluczy; Zestaw przypinany; Kojec; Ładowarka akumulatorów; Napęd flash USB; Do noszenia; Inne
fi: Äänitallentimen muototekijä: Ranneke; Kenttätallentimen moduuli; Kädessä pidettävä; Avaimenperä; Rinnuspakki; Karsina; Virtapankki; USB-muistitikku; Puettava; Muu
es: Factor de forma del grabador de voz: Pulsera; Módulo de grabadora de campo; Portátil; Llavero; Paquete de solapa; Redil; Banco de potencia; Unidad flash USB; Portátil; Otros
it: Fattore di forma del registratore vocale: Braccialetto; Modulo registratore da campo; A mano; Keychain; Pacchetto da bavero; A penna; Power bank; Unità flash USB; Indossabile; Altro
pt-PT: Formato do gravador de voz: Pulseira; Módulo de gravador de campo; Dispositivo portátil; Chaveiro; Pacote de lapela; Caneta; Power bank; Pen USB; Vestível; Outro